Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
ATTACHMENT

Rules of Court

See HRCP rule 64; DCRCP rule 64.

§651-1 General provisions. [Repeal
and reenactment on June 30, 2020. L 2015, c 101, §4.] (a) This
chapter shall apply to circuit and district courts. A judge of any court of record
may make any order at chambers which may by the provisions of this chapter be
made by the court in term time. When the proceedings are before a district
judge, the judge shall be regarded as the clerk of the court for all purposes
contemplated herein. The phrase "police officer", as used in this
chapter, means the director of public safety or the director's duly authorized
representative, any chief of police or subordinate police officer, or an
independent civil process server on the list maintained by the department of
public safety pursuant to section 353C-10. Nothing in this chapter shall be
construed to permit a district judge to issue a writ of attachment to be served
out of the circuit in which the judge's court is situated, or to permit an attachment
of real estate, or any interest therein, under a writ issued by a district
court judge.

(b) The department of public safety, the
State, and the agencies, officers, and employees of the department of public
safety or the State shall not be responsible or liable for the actions of any
independent civil process servers on the list maintained by the department of
public safety pursuant to section 353C-10. The maintenance of the list
pursuant to section 353C-10 shall not create a private cause of action against
the department of public safety, the State, or the agencies, officers, and
employees of the department of public safety or the State.

(c) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed
to make an independent civil process server a law enforcement officer, sheriff,
or deputy sheriff, or an employee or agent of the department of public safety
or the State. [L 1905, c 84, §1; am L 1907, c 27, §1; RL 1925, §2805; RL 1935,
§4190; am L 1939, c 104, §7; am L 1943, c 62, §21 and c 64, §22; RL 1945,
§10141; RL 1955, §233-1; am L 1963, c 85, §3; HRS §651-1; am L 1970, c 188,
§39; gen ch 1985; am L 1986, c 291, §1; am L 1989, c 123, §4 and c 211, §10; am
L 1990, c 281, §§7, 11; am L 2002, c 16, §25; am L 2012, c 142, §9; am L 2013,
c 116, §§12, 25(11)]

Rules of Court

As to powers at chambers, see HRCP rule 77(b).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next